Maryland, session 2026, HB0074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–218.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0074*

HOUSE BILL 74
(b) (1) In addition to the clauses required under subsection (a) of this section,
a procurement contract for construction shall include:
[(1)] (I) a clause providing for contract modification if the condition of a
site differs from the condition described in the specifications; [and]
[(2)] (II) a clause covering the requirements for notice of contract claims,
submission of contract claims, and resolution of contract claims under § 15–219 of this
article; AND
(III) IF THE CONTRACT IS FOR 3 YEARS OR MORE IN DURATION
AND IS VALUED AT GREATER THAN $2,000,000, A CLAUSE REQUIRING CONTRACT
MODIFICATION FOR THE EQUITABLE ADJUSTMENT OF THE CONTRACT FOR
INCREASED COSTS FOR COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS AS A RESULT OF STATUTORY
CHANGES INCREASING REQUIRED COMPENSATION OR BENEFITS.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE CLAUSES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR SECURITY SERVICES THAT IS
FOR 3 YEARS OR MORE IN DURATION AND IS VALUED AT GREATER THAN $2,000,000
SHALL INCLUDE A CLAUSE REQUIRING CONTRACT MODIFICATION FOR THE
EQUITABLE ADJUSTMENT OF THE CONTRACT FOR INCREASED COSTS FOR
COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS AS A RESULT OF:
(I) STATUTORY CHANGES INCREASING REQUIRED
COMPENSATION OR BENEFITS; OR
(II) COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
(3) A CONTRACT THAT IS MODIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS CONTINGENT ON APPROVAL BY
THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER OF THE
APPROPRIATE PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.